Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Recording and Indexing of Judgments; Release

Cross references. —

As to entry of judgment or order by clerk of court, see Rule 58, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Judgments §§ 121 to 195.

Necessity of notice of application or intention to correct error in judgment entry, 14 ALR2d 224.

Judgment ambiguous or silent as to amount of recovery as defective for lack of certainty, 55 ALR2d 723.

Mere rendition or formal entry or docketing of judgment as prerequisite to issuance of valid execution thereon, 65 ALR2d 1162.

49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 100 to 133.

§ 1-16-301.
Recordation of judgments and orders where real property affected.

When a judgment or order is made determining any matter affecting the title to real property, a certified copy of the judgment or order shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the property is situated.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 24, § 2.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 338; R.S. 1887, § 2678; R.S. 1899, § 3772; C.S. 1910, § 4627; C.S. 1920, § 5900; R.S. 1931, § 89-2608; C.S. 1945, § 3-3608; W.S. 1957, § 1-314; Laws 1963, ch. 58, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-301

; Laws 1990, ch. 89, § 2; 2001, ch. 70, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2019 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 24, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all judgments and orders must be entered in the journal of the court and specify clearly the relief granted or order made in the action” and substituted “situated” for “situate.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 24, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (b), which read: “No entry will be made in the journal relating to a judgment by operation of law arising under W.S.

14-2-204

.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Judgment entered as of date rendered. —

Judgment is properly entered on journal as of the date of its rendition, though entry is made later. Hahn v. Citizens' State Bank, 25 Wyo. 467, 171 P. 889, 172 P. 705,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1918).

“Rendition” of judgment distinguished from “entry.” —

Rendition of a judgment is the judicial act of the court in pronouncing the sentence of the law on the facts in controversy, as distinguished from entry, which is the clerical act of spreading the judgment on the record. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Judgment is rendered and exists as such when it is orally announced from the bench. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

The trial court's findings that the judgment in favor of lienor was rendered on August 9, 1972, and that rendition is the judicial act of the court in pronouncing the sentence of the law on the facts in controversy, as distinguished from entry, which is the clerical act of the court of spreading the judgment on the record, was not clearly erroneous. United States v. Hunt, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Motion for new trial is not part of record

unless incorporated in bill of exceptions. Johns v. Adams Bros., 2 Wyo. 194,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1880); Garbanati v. Board of Comm'rs, 2 Wyo. 257,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1880); Perkins v. McDowell, 3 Wyo. 328, 23 P. 71,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1890); Seibel v. Bath, 5 Wyo. 409, 40 P. 756,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1895); Rubel v. Willey, 5 Wyo. 427, 40 P. 761,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1895); Boulter v. State, 6 Wyo. 66, 42 P. 606,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1895); Freeburgh v. Lamoureux, 12 Wyo. 41, 73 P. 545,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1903).

Bill of exceptions

is not merely a statement of exceptions, but includes a statement clearly showing objection, with facts and circumstances on which it is founded, authenticated by trial judge, and brings into record matter which otherwise would not be regularly shown thereby. Middleton v. State, 34 Wyo. 102, 241 P. 715,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1925), modified, 36 Wyo. 356, 255 P. 786,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1927).

Clerk's judgment entry not in conformity with verdict. —

Entry in clerk's minutes in journal, in action to remove county commissioner, that court “ordered the removal of defendant from office, the verdict to include costs,” could not be considered as clerk's entry of judgment in conformity with verdict. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Judgment for costs only incomplete. —

Where record shows what purports to be judgment for costs only, but in which amount of such costs is left blank, judgment, not being exact as to costs, will be reversed and case remanded for new trial. Mosher v. Board of County Comm'rs, 2 Wyo. 462,

1882 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1882).

Sufficient authentication of record judgment. —

When document is authenticated by clerk of court, under court seal as a full and true copy of the record judgment in that court, it is sufficient authentication for use in any other court in Wyoming. Brophy v. J. M. Brunswick & Balke Co., 2 Wyo. 86,

1879 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1879).

Unsigned judgments. —

Where a judgment creditor sought a declaration that its judgment had priority, the fact that the judgment was unsigned did not necessarily render it void. Although the better practice would be that only signed judgments be entered, where an unsigned judgment is entered, the totality of the circumstances must be evaluated to determine its effectiveness. In re Estate of Hite, 829 P.2d 1173,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 26, 1992).

Divorce decree incorporating property lien should be recorded.
—

A divorce decree which incorporates a lien on the property of one of the spouses should be recorded in the county clerk's office of the county wherein the property is situated, to serve as notice to the world of the encumbrance. David v. David, 724 P.2d 1141,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 613

(Wyo. 1986).

Personal property lien effectuated by delivered writ. —

Recordation of the judgment effectuates a lien on nonexempt real property, but the same is not true where personal property is involved, as Wyoming subscribes to the common-law rule that delivery of the writ of execution to the sheriff of the appropriate county creates an execution lien on personal property of the debtor. In re Cockreham, 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Stated

in

Remilong v. Crolla, 576 P.2d 461,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1978); Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 1-16-302.
Record; requirement.

The clerk shall make
a complete record of every cause as soon as it is finally determined,
unless such record or part thereof is waived.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 339; R.S. 1887, § 2679; R.S. 1899, § 3773; C.S. 1910, § 4628; C.S. 1920, § 5901; R.S. 1931, § 89-2609; C.S. 1945, § 3-3609; W.S. 1957, § 1-315; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-302

.

Cited

in

Middleton v. State, 34 Wyo. 102, 241 P. 715,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(1925).

§ 1-16-303.
Record; contents.

The record shall contain
the complaint, the process, the return, pleadings subsequent thereto
and all material acts and proceedings of the court. If the items of
an account or the copies of papers attached to the pleadings are voluminous,
the court may order the record to be made by abbreviating the same
or inserting a pertinent description thereof, or by omitting them
entirely. Evidence will not be recorded.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 341; R.S. 1887, § 2681; R.S. 1899, § 3775; C.S. 1910, § 4630; C.S. 1920, § 5903; R.S. 1931, § 89-2611; C.S. 1945, § 3-3611; W.S. 1957, § 1-317; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-303

.

Alleged errors occurring at trial

must be called to the attention of the court by motion for a new trial. Boulter v. State, 6 Wyo. 66, 42 P. 606,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1895); Ross v. State, 8 Wyo. 351, 57 P. 924,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1899).

Appellate court, in considering case, is confined to record on appeal,

and it may not, by affidavits filed in such court, be shown when judgment was entered, or that it was or was not entered, thereby contradicting or supplementing the record. Hahn v. Citizens' State Bank, 25 Wyo. 467, 171 P. 889, 172 P. 705,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1918).

An agreed statement of facts

does not come within the definitions set out in this section and is not part of the record proper. Johnson v. McDonald, 73 Wyo. 263, 278 P.2d 268,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1954).

If an agreed statement of facts is contained in the judgment, then it is part of the record proper. Johnson v. McDonald, 73 Wyo. 263, 278 P.2d 268,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1954).

Motion not part of record proper. —

A motion filed in court below and ruling thereon is not part of the record proper under this section, and cannot be reviewed on writ of error unless brought into record by bill of exceptions. Fitzpatrick v. Rogan, 27 Wyo. 388, 197 P. 565,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1921).

Including one for appointment of receiver. —

In absence of bill of exceptions, motion of plaintiff for appointment of a receiver is not properly in the record on writ of error to supreme court, not being part of the record proper, under this section, though among the authenticated original papers in case there is such motion. Fitzpatrick v. Rogan, 27 Wyo. 388, 197 P. 565,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1921).

Overruling order. —

An order overruling a demurrer (now motion to dismiss) to the petition for want of facts was a part of the record and, with the pleadings, was properly presented for review on error without a bill of exceptions. Grover Irrigation & Land Co. v. Lovella Ditch, Reservoir & Irrigation Co., 21 Wyo. 204, 131 P. 43,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1913).

Motion to vacate judgment filed during term at which judgment was rendered

was not independent proceeding and, therefore, must be embraced in bill of exceptions on proceedings in error. Sioux City Seed Co. v. Montgomery, 42 Wyo. 170, 291 P. 918,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1930).

Oral motions. —

Wherever a bill of exceptions is necessary to bring a written motion into the record on writ of error, such bill is also necessary to bring in an oral motion for the same purpose. Fitzpatrick v. Rogan, 28 Wyo. 231, 203 P. 245,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1922).

Motion for new trial. —

Writ of error will not be dismissed for want of bill of exceptions on motion for new trial where only questions of law, determinable on facts shown by record, are involved. In re Austin's Estate, 35 Wyo. 176, 246 P. 459,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1926). See Rule 72 and 75.

Statutes requiring clerk to keep enumerated books

has no bearing on question whether execution is part of record proper. Lawer Auto Supply v. Teton Auto Co., 39 Wyo. 14, 269 P. 29,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1928).

Cited

in

Johns v. Adams Bros., 2 Wyo. 194,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1880); Garbanati v. Board of Comm'rs, 2 Wyo. 257,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1880); Perkins v. McDowell, 3 Wyo. 328, 23 P. 71,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1890); Rubel v. Willey, 5 Wyo. 427, 40 P. 761,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1895); Seibel v. Bath, 5 Wyo. 409, 40 P. 756,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1895); Boulter v. State, 6 Wyo. 66, 42 P. 606,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1895); Underwood v. David, 9 Wyo. 178, 61 P. 1012,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1900); Freeburgh v. Lamoureux, 12 Wyo. 41, 73 P. 545,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1903); Middleton v. State, 34 Wyo. 102, 241 P. 715,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(1925); State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1926).

§ 1-16-304.
Transcription into new volume.

A court by order on the
journal, may direct its clerk to transcribe any book in his office
into a new volume, and the transcripts made are as valid as the original.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 343; R.S. 1887, § 2683; R.S. 1899, § 3777; C.S. 1910, § 4632; C.S. 1920, § 5905; R.S. 1931, § 89-2613; C.S. 1945, § 3-3613; W.S. 1957, § 1-319; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-304

.

§ 1-16-305.
When complete record not required.

W.S.

1-16-302

does not apply:

In criminal prosecutions when the indictment has been quashed, or when the district attorney has entered a nolle prosequi on the indictment;

When the action has been dismissed without prejudice to a future action, as provided in W.S.

1-16-306

;

In all actions in which, in open court, at the term at which the final order or judgment is made, both parties agree that no record shall be made.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 344; R.S. 1887, § 2684; R.S. 1899, § 3778; C.S. 1910, § 4633; C.S. 1920, § 5906; R.S. 1931, § 89-2614; C.S. 1945, § 3-3614; W.S. 1957, § 1-320; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-305

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to dismissal of actions, see Rule 41, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-16-306.
Record in dismissed action.

When an action has been
dismissed without prejudice to a future action, the clerk shall make
a complete record of the proceedings upon being paid therefor by the
party requesting it.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 345; R.S. 1887, § 2685; R.S. 1899, § 3779; C.S. 1910, § 4634; C.S. 1920, § 5907; R.S. 1931, § 89-2615; C.S. 1945, § 3-3615; W.S. 1957, § 1-321; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-306

.

§ 1-16-307.
Index to judgments.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the clerk shall keep and make available for public inspection an index of all civil judgments containing the following information:

The name of the judgment debtor or, for orders establishing or modifying a child support obligation, the obligor;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 24, § 2.

The amount of the original judgment and the year when it was rendered;

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 24, § 2.

Whether the notice of satisfaction has been filed and the date the notice was filed.

No index shall be made of a judgment by operation of law arising under W.S.

14-2-204

, and no index shall be made of a judgment by operation of law arising under W.S. 7-9-103(d) until execution is issued upon request of the victim, the division of victim services or the district attorney pursuant to W.S. 7-9-103(d). Judgments whose access are restricted by law or court rule shall not be included in the index required under subsection (a) of this section.

The clerk shall include in the index required by subsection (a) of this section all judgments, decrees and orders establishing or modifying a child support obligation.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 24, § 2.

The procedures for compiling and maintaining the judgment index required by subsection (a) of this section may be modified by the court to permit the compilation and maintenance by any manual, mechanical, electronic or other means calculated to ensure the accuracy of the index.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 346; R.S. 1887, § 2686; R.S. 1899, § 3780; C.S. 1910, § 4635; C.S. 1920, § 5908; R.S. 1931, § 89-2616; C.S. 1945, § 3-3616; W.S. 1957, § 1-322; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-307

; Laws 1990, ch. 89, § 2; 2001, ch. 70, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2019 ch. 24, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019,
in (a), substituted “and make available for public inspection an index of all civil judgments containing” for “an index, direct and reverse, of all judgments, by the names of parties alphabetically arranged showing in separate columns” and added “information:” after “following”; in (a)(i), added “or, for orders establishing or modifying a child support obligation, the obligor;” after “debtor”; in (a)(iii), added “original” before “judgment” and deleted “and term”; in (a)(vii), substituted “Whether” for “The number and time of issue of,” substituted “notice of” for “execution and satisfaction thereof when” and substituted “filed and the date the notice was filed” for “made”; in (b), added “, and no index shall be made of a judgment by operation of law arising under W.S. 7-9-103(d) until execution is issued upon request of the victim, the division of victim services or the district attorney pursuant to W.S. 7-9-103(d). Judgments whose access are restricted by law or court rule shall not be included in the index required under subsection (a) of this section.”; in (c), added a period after “obligation” and added “, provided the index in such case shall show.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch 24, §
2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “The name of the judgment debtor”; repealed former (a)(iv) through (a)(vi), which read: ”(iv) The page of the journal on which it is entered; (v) The volume and page of the final record; (vi) The number of the suit”; and repealed (c)(i) through (c)(iii), which read: “(i) The name of the obligor; (ii) The name of the obligee; and (iii) The docket number of the suit.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Statutory requirements of indexing. —

Variation from the statutory requirements for indexing must meet the minimum requirements of the statute unless the legislature authorizes alternative methods for maintaining the index, or the method actually in use (e.g., computer storage) is made readily and plainly available to the public and operates in such a manner as to fully comply with governing statutes. In re Estate of Hite, 829 P.2d 1173,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 26, 1992).

The burden of satisfying the information supplying requirements of this section is upon the clerk and not upon the citizenry. In re Estate of Hite, 829 P.2d 1173,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 26, 1992).

Cited

in

Hahn v. Citizens State Bank, 25 Wyo. 467, 171 P. 889,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1918); State Bd. of Law Exmrs. v. Strahan, 44 Wyo. 156, 8 P.2d 1090,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1932).

§ 1-16-308.
Release of satisfied judgment; requirement.

Any action pending or judgment rendered in the district courts of this state which has been settled or satisfied shall be released or dismissed in writing upon the face of the docket or by written release by the attorney of record or the person in whose favor the judgment was rendered, who shall date and sign the release. If neither the attorney of record nor the judgment creditor can be found in the county, the judgment debtor may pay the amount due upon the judgment to the clerk of court. Upon proper showing to the court that the judgment has been paid in full, the court shall order the judgment released and satisfied.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to judgments arising by operation of law under W.S.

14-2-204

.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 114, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5881; R.S. 1931, § 89-2207; Laws 1945, ch. 61, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-3617; W.S. 1957, § 1-323; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-308

; Laws 1990, ch. 89, § 2; 2001, ch. 70, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Authority of trial court. —

The trial court had the authority to order a judgment debtor to submit the amount of the judgment debt to the clerk of the court and to order the clerk to enter a satisfaction of judgment. Stilson v. Hodges, 934 P.2d 736,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Amerigas Propane, Inc. v. Bing, 875 P.2d 1276,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-16-309.
Release of satisfied judgment; liability for failure.

If the attorney of record or other proper person fails to release any action pending or judgment rendered within fifteen (15) days after settlement or satisfaction, the person in whose favor the judgment was rendered is liable for damages sustained.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to judgments by operation of law arising under W.S.

14-2-204

.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 114, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5882; R.S. 1931, § 89-2208; C.S. 1945, § 3-3618; W.S. 1957, § 1-324; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-309

; Laws 1990, ch. 89, § 2; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Authority of trial court. —

The trial court had the authority to order a judgment debtor to submit the amount of the judgment debt to the clerk of the court and to order the clerk to enter a satisfaction of judgment. Stilson v. Hodges, 934 P.2d 736,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1997).